Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1710
Facility; standards; State Veterinarian; prescribe; concentration points; inspection; approval.

Livestock moving in commerce handled by dealers covered by the provisions of sections 54-1701 to 54-1711 and held at a facility shall be held at a facility conforming to standards prescribed by regulation by the State Veterinarian, and in no case shall the standards be less than the standards prescribed for livestock auction markets. Such facility shall not be used unless it has been approved by the State Veterinarian.

Livestock moving into a concentration point shall not be removed from the premises until such livestock has been inspected and released by the approved veterinarian. No livestock shall be released from a concentration point until all the requirements of the State of Nebraska or the state of destination, whichever applies, shall have been met.

Laws 1969, c. 447, § 10, p. 1498.